Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [216C.392] SUPPLEMENTAL ENERGY ASSISTANCE GRANT PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "LIHEAP" has the meaning given in section 142G.02, subdivision 59. new text end new text begin (c) "Crisis grant" means a grant to a low-income household to prevent shut-off of residential energy services, to reinstate residential energy services, or to enable delivery of residential fuels. new text end new text begin (d) "Primary energy grant" means a grant to help a low-income household maintain and continue affordable energy service. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin A supplemental energy assistance grant program is established in the department to award grants to eligible applicants. The purpose of the program is to assist low-income households experiencing energy burden to pay the costs of heating, cooling, and other home energy costs throughout the year. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Applications; procedures. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must develop policies and procedures governing the grant application and award process, and must leverage existing LIHEAP application processes and infrastructure to the maximum degree practicable. new text end new text begin (b) An eligible applicant must file an application with the commissioner on a form developed by the commissioner. The form must be available to eligible applicants in both a paper and electronic format. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must accept grant applications and award grants under this section throughout the year. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin (a) A Minnesota resident whose household income is below the income eligibility threshold identified in the Minnesota LIHEAP Detailed Model Plan submitted to the United States Department of Health and Human Services for the applicable program year is eligible to receive a grant award under this section. If the LIHEAP Detailed Model Plan is not available, the commissioner may develop a similar income eligibility threshold. new text end new text begin (b) An organization with experience conducting outreach for programs designed for low-income households is eligible for grants awarded under subdivision 6, clause (4). new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Grant awards. new text end new text begin (a) When awarding grants under this section, the commissioner must give priority to expanding the number of households receiving energy assistance over increasing grant amounts to households that already received assistance under LIHEAP during the same year. new text end new text begin (b) To the extent practicable, available LIHEAP funds must be awarded to all eligible applicants for primary energy and crisis grants before energy and crisis grants are awarded under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Types of grants. new text end new text begin The commissioner may award grants under this section for: new text end new text begin (1) crisis grants to households that received a LIHEAP primary energy grant from federal funds but did not receive the maximum crisis grant amount while federal funds allocated for crisis grants were available; new text end new text begin (2) primary energy and crisis grants to eligible households that did not receive LIHEAP primary energy and crisis grants from federal funds; new text end new text begin (3) emergency heating system repair or replacement; and new text end new text begin (4) outreach activities. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin (a) Beginning January 31, 2028, and annually thereafter until January 31, 2030, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and house of representatives committees with primary jurisdiction over energy policy and finance that documents state supplemental energy assistance grant awards made under this section during the previous program year from October 1 to September 30. new text end new text begin (b) To the extent practicable, the following information on grants awarded under this section must be reported by statewide total, by county, and by census tract within cities with populations over 30,000: new text end new text begin (1) the number of households awarded a grant; new text end new text begin (2) the number of households served that did not receive a LIHEAP primary energy grant; new text end new text begin (3) the average primary energy grant award; new text end new text begin (4) the average crisis grant award; and new text end new text begin (5) average annual costs of heating and electricity for households served. new text end new text begin (c) The following information on grants awarded under this section may be reported as statewide totals: new text end new text begin (1) the average household income of grant recipients; new text end new text begin (2) a distribution of grant awards by grant recipients' household income expressed as a percentage of the federal poverty level established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services; new text end new text begin (3) the number of households that include a person over 60 years old; new text end new text begin (4) the number of households that include a disabled person; new text end new text begin (5) the number of households that include a child under six years old; and new text end new text begin (6) the number of households served by race or ethnicity. new text end new text begin (d) A report under this section must comply with the provisions of chapter 13, including provisions establishing data on individuals as not public in order to ensure the individual privacy of applicants. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $40,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of commerce for the supplemental energy assistance grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 216C.392. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until December 31, 2029. new text end new text begin (b) Of the amount appropriated in paragraph (a): new text end new text begin (1) up to 12.5 percent may be used for staffing and other costs associated with administering the supplemental energy assistance grant program under Minnesota Statutes, section 216C.392, including program planning and preparation, reviewing applications and verifying information, and entering data into a central electronic system maintained by the Department of Commerce. Of this funding, up to 2.5 percent may be used by the Department of Commerce. The remaining amount allocated under this clause may be used to reimburse reasonable administrative costs incurred under Minnesota Statutes, section 216C.392, by service providers contracted by the Department of Commerce to deliver LIHEAP services; and new text end new text begin (2) up to five percent may be used to reimburse the reasonable costs incurred under Minnesota Statutes, section 216C.392, by organizations the department has contracted with to provide outreach and assistance to households to complete grant applications under Minnesota Statutes, section 216C.392. Priority for grants awarded under this clause must be given to organizations that have the ability to conduct outreach to underserved communities and populations, including current service providers and other organizations. new text end